Washington statutes.
RCW 19.230.110

Annual assessment and annual report.

(1) A licensee shall pay an annual assessment as established in rule by the director no later than the annual assessment due date or, if the annual assessment due date is not a business day, on the next business day. A licensee shall pay an annual assessment based on the previous year's Washington dollar volume of: (a) Money transmissions; (b) payment instruments; (c) currency exchanges; and (d) prepaid access sales. The total minimum assessment must be one thousand dollars per year, and the maximum assessment may not exceed one hundred thousand dollars per year.

(2) A licensee shall submit an accurate annual report with the annual assessment, in a form and in a medium prescribed by the director in rule. The annual report must state or contain:

(a) If the licensee is a money transmitter, a copy of the licensee's most recent audited annual financial statement or, if the licensee is a wholly owned subsidiary of another corporation, the most recent audited consolidated annual financial statement of the parent corporation or the licensee's most recent audited consolidated annual financial statement;

(b) A description of each material change, as defined in rule by the director, to information submitted by the licensee in its original license application which has not been previously reported to the director on any required report;

(c) If the licensee is a money transmitter, a list of the licensee's permissible investments and a certification that the licensee continues to maintain permissible investments according to the requirements set forth in RCW 19.230.200 and 19.230.210;

(d) If the licensee is a money transmitter, proof that the licensee continues to maintain an adequate bond as required by RCW 19.230.050; and

(e) A list of the locations where the licensee or an authorized delegate of the licensee engages in or provides money services to persons in Washington state.

(3) If a licensee does not file an annual report or pay its annual assessment by the annual assessment due date, the director or the director's designee shall send the licensee a notice of suspension and assess the licensee a late fee not to exceed twenty-five percent of the annual assessment as established in rule by the director. The licensee's annual report and payment of both the annual assessment and the late fee must arrive in the department's offices by 5:00 p.m. on the thirtieth day after the assessment due date or any extension of time granted by the director, unless that date is not a business day, in which case the licensee's annual report and payment of both the annual assessment and the late fee must arrive in the department's offices by 5:00 p.m. on the next occurring business day. If the licensee's annual report and payment of both the annual assessment and late fee do not arrive by such date, the expiration of the licensee's license is effective at 5:00 p.m. on the thirtieth day after the assessment due date, unless that date is not a business day, in which case the expiration of the licensee's license is effective at 5:00 p.m. on the next occurring business day. The director, or the director's designee, may reinstate the license if, within twenty days after its effective date, the licensee:

(a) Files the annual report and pays both the annual assessment and the late fee; and

(b) Did not engage in or provide money services during the period its license was expired.

[ 2017 c 30 s 9; 2013 c 106 s 4; 2010 c 73 s 6; 2003 c 287 s 13.]